Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-2,117
Contested case hearing; mediation or nonbinding arbitration required; when; costs.

The Chief Water Officer shall not conduct a contested case hearing on an instream appropriation application filed after January 1, 1997, other than a hearing to address procedural matters, until such time as the parties have completed mediation or nonbinding arbitration. Mediation or nonbinding arbitration shall be deemed completed when the person retained to conduct the mediation or nonbinding arbitration has concluded further efforts would probably not result in resolution of major issues. The costs of mediation or nonbinding arbitration shall be shared by the parties.

Laws 1997, LB 877, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 150;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 134.